District of Columbia statutes.
29-703.03

No liability as limited partner for limited partnership obligations.

(a)

A debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited partnership, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise, is not attributable to a limited partner. A limited partner shall not be personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for an a debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited partnership solely by reason of being a limited partner, even if the limited partner participates in the management and control of the limited partnership.

(b)

The failure of a limited partnership to observe formalities relating to the exercise of its powers or management of its activities and affairs is not a ground for imposing liability on a limited partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(4)(C), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 303 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.